Tennessee, session 114, HB0417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-7-116(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "November 1" and substituting "October 15".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-7-116(b), is amended by deleting
"November 1" and substituting "October 15".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0417
002216
- 1 -